Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 4. Duties.

§ 56-370.
Repealed by Acts 1956, c. 435.

§§ 56-371 through 56-382.

Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

§ 56-383.
Railroad company may construct and maintain telegraph or telephone line.

Any railroad company may construct and maintain along the line of its improvement an electric telegraph or telephone for its own use and that of the public, and may make reasonable charges on messages and intelligence conveyed thereby.

History.
Code 1919, § 3943.

§§ 56-384 through 56-389.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.